test/src/morphology/N-kol_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - кол: # Noun 'mother'
     кол+N+Sg+Nom: кол
     кол+N+Sg+Gen: колын
     кол+N+Sg+Acc: колым
     кол+N+Sg+Com: колге
     кол+N+Sg+Dat: коллан
     кол+N+Sg+Ine: колышты
     кол+N+Sg+Ill: колышкы
     кол+N+Sg+Lat: колеш
     кол+N+Sg+Comp: колла
     кол+N+Sg+Abe: колде
     кол+N+Pl+Nom: колвлӓ
     кол+N+Pl+Gen: колвлӓн
     кол+N+Pl+Acc: колвлӓм
     кол+N+Pl+Com: колвлӓге
     кол+N+Pl+Dat: колвлӓлӓн
     кол+N+Pl+Ine: колвлӓштӹ
     кол+N+Pl+Ill: [колвлӓшкӹ, колвлӓш]
     кол+N+Pl+Lat: колвлӓэш
     кол+N+Pl+Comp: колвлӓлӓ
     кол+N+Pl+Abe: колвлӓде

#     кол+N+PxSg1+Sg+Nom: [колем, колэм] # х2 колэмжӹ
     кол+N+PxSg1+Sg+Nom: колем
     кол+N+PxSg1+Sg+Gen: колемӹн
     кол+N+PxSg1+Sg+Acc: колемӹм
     кол+N+PxSg1+Sg+Com: колемге
     кол+N+PxSg1+Sg+Dat: колемлӓн
     кол+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: колыштем
     кол+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: колышкем
     кол+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg1: колешем
#     кол+N+PxSg1+Sg+Comp: [коллаэм, колемлӓ] 
     кол+N+Sg+Comp+PxSg1: коллаэм 
     кол+N+PxSg1+Sg+Comp: колемлӓ 
#     кол+N+PxSg1+Sg+Abe: [колдеэм, колемде] 
     кол+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: колдеэм
     кол+N+PxSg1+Sg+Abe: колемде 
#     кол+N+PxSg1+Pl+Nom: [колвлӓэм, колемвлӓ] # х3
     кол+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: колвлӓэм
     кол+N+PxSg1+Pl+Nom: колемвлӓ
     кол+N+PxSg1+Pl+Gen: колемвлӓн
     кол+N+PxSg1+Pl+Acc: колемвлӓм
#     кол+N+PxSg1+Pl+Com: [колвлӓэмге]
     кол+N+Pl+PxSg1+Com: колвлӓэмге
#     кол+N+PxSg1+Pl+Dat: [колвлӓэмлӓн, колвлӓлӓнем, колемвлӓлӓ]
     кол+N+Pl+PxSg1+Dat: колвлӓэмлӓн
     кол+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: колвлӓлӓнем
     кол+N+PxSg1+Pl+Dat: колемвлӓлӓн
# Is this usage or morphology?
#     кол+N+PxSg1+Pl+Ine: [колвлӓштем, колемвлӓштӹ] 
#     кол+N+PxSg1+Pl+Ill: [колвлӓшкем, колемвлӓшкӹ]
     кол+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: колвлӓштем
     кол+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: колвлӓшкем
#     кол+N+PxSg1+Pl+Lat: [колвлӓэшем, колемвлӓэш]
     кол+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg1: колвлӓэшем
     кол+N+PxSg1+Pl+Lat: колемвлӓэш
#     кол+N+PxSg1+Pl+Comp: [колвлӓэмлӓ, колвлӓлӓэм, колемвлӓлӓ]
     кол+N+Pl+PxSg1+Comp: колвлӓэмлӓ
     кол+N+Pl+Comp+PxSg1: колвлӓлӓэм
     кол+N+PxSg1+Pl+Comp: колемвлӓлӓ
#     кол+N+PxSg1+Pl+Abe: [колвлӓэмде, колемвлӓде]
     кол+N+Pl+PxSg1+Abe: колвлӓэмде
     кол+N+PxSg1+Pl+Abe: колемвлӓде

     кол+N+PxSg2+Sg+Nom: колет
     кол+N+PxSg2+Sg+Gen: колетӹн
     кол+N+PxSg2+Sg+Acc: колетӹм
     кол+N+PxSg2+Sg+Com: колетге
     кол+N+PxSg2+Sg+Dat: колетлӓн
     кол+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: колыштет #??
     кол+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: колышкет
     кол+N+PxSg2+Sg+Lat: колетӹш
     кол+N+PxSg2+Sg+Comp: колетлӓ #
     кол+N+PxSg2+Sg+Abe: колетде
     кол+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: колвлӓэт
     кол+N+PxSg2+Pl+Gen: колетвлӓн #
     кол+N+PxSg2+Pl+Acc: колетвлӓм
     кол+N+PxSg2+Pl+Com: колетвлӓге
     кол+N+PxSg2+Pl+Dat: колетвлӓлӓн #пӧрт:пӧртвлӓлӓнет
     кол+N+PxSg2+Pl+Ine: колетвлӓштӹ
     кол+N+PxSg2+Pl+Ill: [колетвлӓшкӹ, колетвлӓш]
     кол+N+PxSg2+Pl+Lat: колетвлӓэш
     кол+N+PxSg2+Pl+Comp: колетвлӓлӓ
     кол+N+PxSg2+Pl+Abe: колетвлӓде

     кол+N+PxSg3+Sg+Nom: колжы
     кол+N+PxSg3+Sg+Gen: колжын
     кол+N+PxSg3+Sg+Acc: колжым
     кол+N+PxSg3+Sg+Com: колжыге 
     кол+N+PxSg3+Sg+Dat: колжылан 
     кол+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: колыштыжы #??
     кол+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: колышкыжы #??
     кол+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg3: колешӹжӹ #
     кол+N+PxSg3+Sg+Comp: колжыла
     кол+N+PxSg3+Sg+Abe: колжыде
     кол+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: колвлӓжӹ
     кол+N+Pl+PxSg3+Gen: колвлӓжӹн
     кол+N+Pl+PxSg3+Acc: колвлӓжӹм
     кол+N+Pl+PxSg3+Com: колвлӓжӹге
     кол+N+Pl+PxSg3+Dat: колвлӓжӹлӓн
     кол+N+Pl+PxSg3+Ine: колвлӓжӹштӹ #??
     кол+N+Pl+PxSg3+Ill: колвлӓжӹшкӹ #??
     кол+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg3: колвлӓэшӹжӹ #??
     кол+N+Pl+PxSg3+Comp: колвлӓжӹлӓ
     кол+N+Pl+PxSg3+Abe: колвлӓжӹде


#колт, колэт, колэтшӹ, 
#колжы, 
